old/xu-hyphen/utf8-grphyph4.tex
\message{UTF-8 hyphenation patterns for Modern, Polytonic Greek}
% This file was mechanically translated from a set of elhyphen patterns
% via "elhyph-utf8 -p" (version 0.2).
\begingroup
\lccode`'=`'\lccode`’=`’\lccode`ʼ=`ʼ\lccode`᾽=`᾽\lccode`᾿=`᾿
\patterns{%
%%%% diphthogs (also known as "double vowels") and exceptions
α2ι 
α2ί α2ί α2ί 
α2ὶ α2ὶ 
α2ῖ α2ῖ 
α2ἰ α2ἰ 
α2ἴ α2ἴ 
α2ἲ α2ἲ 
α2ἶ α2ἶ 
α2ἱ α2ἱ 
α2ἵ α2ἵ 
α2ἳ α2ἳ 
α2ἷ α2ἷ 
% 'a3i --- not to be separated: ne-r'aida
α2υ 
α2ύ α2ύ α2ύ 
α2ὺ α2ὺ 
α2ῦ α2ῦ 
α2ὐ α2ὐ 
α2ὔ α2ὔ 
α2ὒ α2ὒ 
α2ὖ α2ὖ 
α2ὑ α2ὑ 
α2ὕ α2ὕ 
α2ὓ α2ὓ 
α2ὗ α2ὗ 
ά3υ ά3υ ά3υ 
ε2ι 
ε2ί ε2ί ε2ί 
ε2ὶ ε2ὶ 
ε2ῖ ε2ῖ 
ε2ἰ ε2ἰ 
ε2ἴ ε2ἴ 
ε2ἲ ε2ἲ 
ε2ἶ ε2ἶ 
ε2ἱ ε2ἱ 
ε2ἵ ε2ἵ 
ε2ἳ ε2ἳ 
ε2ἷ ε2ἷ 
% 'e3i --- not to be separated: t`o rw-m'ei-ko (one way to pronounce it)
ε2υ 
ε2ύ ε2ύ ε2ύ 
ε2ὺ ε2ὺ 
ε2ῦ ε2ῦ 
ε2ὐ ε2ὐ 
ε2ὔ ε2ὔ 
ε2ὒ ε2ὒ 
ε2ὖ ε2ὖ 
ε2ὑ ε2ὑ 
ε2ὕ ε2ὕ 
ε2ὓ ε2ὓ 
ε2ὗ ε2ὗ 
έ3υ έ3υ έ3υ 
η2υ 
η2ύ η2ύ η2ύ 
η2ὺ η2ὺ 
η2ῦ η2ῦ 
η2ὐ η2ὐ 
η2ὔ η2ὔ 
η2ὒ η2ὒ 
η2ὖ η2ὖ 
η2ὑ η2ὑ 
η2ὕ η2ὕ 
η2ὓ η2ὓ 
η2ὗ η2ὗ 
ο2ι 
ο2ί ο2ί ο2ί 
ο2ὶ ο2ὶ 
ο2ῖ ο2ῖ 
ο2ἰ ο2ἰ 
ο2ἴ ο2ἴ 
ο2ἲ ο2ἲ 
ο2ἶ ο2ἶ 
ο2ἱ ο2ἱ 
ο2ἵ ο2ἵ 
ο2ἳ ο2ἳ 
ο2ἷ ο2ἷ 
% 'o3i --- not to be separated: t`o ko-r'oido
ο2υ 
ο2ύ ο2ύ ο2ύ 
ο2ὺ ο2ὺ 
ο2ῦ ο2ῦ 
ο2ὐ ο2ὐ 
ο2ὔ ο2ὔ 
ο2ὒ ο2ὒ 
ο2ὖ ο2ὖ 
ο2ὑ ο2ὑ 
ο2ὕ ο2ὕ 
ο2ὓ ο2ὓ 
ο2ὗ ο2ὗ 
ό3υ ό3υ ό3υ 
υ2ι 
υ2ί υ2ί υ2ί 
υ2ὶ υ2ὶ 
υ2ῖ υ2ῖ 
υ2ἰ υ2ἰ 
υ2ἴ υ2ἴ 
υ2ἲ υ2ἲ 
υ2ἶ υ2ἶ 
υ2ἱ υ2ἱ 
υ2ἵ υ2ἵ 
υ2ἳ υ2ἳ 
υ2ἷ υ2ἷ 
%%%% other diphthogs: two vowels pronounced together in *one* syllable
%%%% (in some cases, the rules below will not allow the split up of
%%%% syllables in words like: >i-'on, ka-ko-poi-'oc, etc., but, better
%%%% this than mistakes like: qw-ri-'o)
α2η 
ά3η. ά3η. ά3η.   % Dan'a-h Bomb'a-h 
ά3ι. ά3ι. ά3ι.   % ts'a-i 
α2ϊ α2ϊ 
% 'a"i --- not be separated: ne-r'a"ida 
ά3ϊ. ά3ϊ. ά3ϊ.   % ts'a-"i 
α2ϋ α2ϋ   % ka"u-moc 
ά3ϋ ά3ϋ ά3ϋ 
ε2η   % leh-lat~w >e-l'eh-son 
ε2ϊ ε2ϊ   % ze"i-mpekikoc 
ε2ϋ ε2ϋ   % Ke"u-l'anh 
ο2ει   % ap'oei-de 
ο2η   % b'oh-ja! 
ό3η. ό3η. ό3η.   % ql'o-h 
ο2ϊ ο2ϊ 
ό3ι ό3ι ό3ι   % s'o-i ro-l'o-i 
ό3ϊ ό3ϊ ό3ϊ 
ω2ι   % >wi-m'e! 
%%%%
ι2α 
ι2ά ι2ά ι2ά 
ι2ὰ ι2ὰ 
ι2ᾶ ι2ᾶ 
ι2ε 
ι2έ ι2έ ι2έ 
ι2ὲ ι2ὲ 
ι2ο 
ι2ό ι2ό ι2ό 
ι2ὸ ι2ὸ 
ο3ϊ3ό ο3ϊ3ό ο3ϊ3ό   % pro-"i-'on 
ο3ϊ3ὸ ο3ϊ3ὸ 
ι2ω 
ι2ώ ι2ώ ι2ώ 
ι2ὼ ι2ὼ 
ι2ῶ ι2ῶ 
ί3 ί3 ί3 
ῖ3 ῖ3 
ἰ3 ἰ3 
ἱ3 ἱ3 
η2α 
ῃ2α ῃ2α 
η2ά η2ά η2ά 
η2ὰ η2ὰ 
η2ᾶ η2ᾶ 
ῃ2ά ῃ2ά ῃ2ά 
ῃ2ὰ ῃ2ὰ 
ῃ2ᾶ ῃ2ᾶ 
η2ε 
ῃ2ε ῃ2ε 
η2έ η2έ η2έ 
η2ὲ η2ὲ 
ῃ2έ ῃ2έ ῃ2έ 
ῃ2ὲ ῃ2ὲ 
η2ο 
ῃ2ο ῃ2ο 
η2ό η2ό η2ό 
η2ὸ η2ὸ 
ῃ2ό ῃ2ό ῃ2ό 
ῃ2ὸ ῃ2ὸ 
η2ω 
ῃ2ω ῃ2ω 
η2ώ η2ώ η2ώ 
η2ὼ η2ὼ 
η2ῶ η2ῶ 
ῃ2ώ ῃ2ώ ῃ2ώ 
ῃ2ὼ ῃ2ὼ 
ῃ2ῶ ῃ2ῶ 
ή3 ή3 ή3 
ῆ3 ῆ3 
ἠ3 ἠ3 
ἡ3 ἡ3 
υ2α 
υ2ά υ2ά υ2ά 
υ2ὰ υ2ὰ 
υ2ᾶ υ2ᾶ 
υ2ε 
υ2έ υ2έ υ2έ 
υ2ὲ υ2ὲ 
υ2ο 
υ2ό υ2ό υ2ό 
υ2ὸ υ2ὸ 
υ2ω 
υ2ώ υ2ώ υ2ώ 
υ2ὼ υ2ὼ 
υ2ῶ υ2ῶ 
ύ3 ύ3 ύ3 
ῦ3 ῦ3 
ὑ3 ὑ3 
%%%% consonants at the end of words
6β. 
6γ. 
6γκ. 
6δ. 
6ζ. 
6θ. 
6κ. 
6λ. 
6μ. 
6μπ. 
6ν. 
6ντ. 
6ξ. 
6π. 
6ρ. 
6σ. 6ϲ. 
6ς. 
6τ. 
6τζ. 
6τσ. 6τϲ. 
6τς. 
6φ. 
6χ. 
6ψ. 
%%%% right apostrophe and consonants with right apostrophe 
6' 6’ 6ʼ 6᾽ 6᾿ 
6β' 6β’ 6βʼ 6β᾽ 6β᾿ 
6γ' 6γ’ 6γʼ 6γ᾽ 6γ᾿ 
6γκ' 6γκ’ 6γκʼ 6γκ᾽ 6γκ᾿ 
6δ' 6δ’ 6δʼ 6δ᾽ 6δ᾿ 
6ζ' 6ζ’ 6ζʼ 6ζ᾽ 6ζ᾿ 
6θ' 6θ’ 6θʼ 6θ᾽ 6θ᾿ 
6κ' 6κ’ 6κʼ 6κ᾽ 6κ᾿ 
6λ' 6λ’ 6λʼ 6λ᾽ 6λ᾿ 
6μ' 6μ’ 6μʼ 6μ᾽ 6μ᾿ 
6μπ' 6μπ’ 6μπʼ 6μπ᾽ 6μπ᾿ 
6ν' 6ν’ 6νʼ 6ν᾽ 6ν᾿ 
6ντ' 6ντ’ 6ντʼ 6ντ᾽ 6ντ᾿ 
6ξ' 6ξ’ 6ξʼ 6ξ᾽ 6ξ᾿ 
6π' 6π’ 6πʼ 6π᾽ 6π᾿ 
6ρ' 6ρ’ 6ρʼ 6ρ᾽ 6ρ᾿ 
6σ' 6σ’ 6σʼ 6σ᾽ 6σ᾿ 6ϲ' 6ϲ’ 6ϲʼ 6ϲ᾽ 6ϲ᾿ 
6τ' 6τ’ 6τʼ 6τ᾽ 6τ᾿ 
6τζ' 6τζ’ 6τζʼ 6τζ᾽ 6τζ᾿ 
6τσ' 6τσ’ 6τσʼ 6τσ᾽ 6τσ᾿ 6τϲ' 6τϲ’ 6τϲʼ 6τϲ᾽ 6τϲ᾿ 
6φ' 6φ’ 6φʼ 6φ᾽ 6φ᾿ 
6χ' 6χ’ 6χʼ 6χ᾽ 6χ᾿ 
6ψ' 6ψ’ 6ψʼ 6ψ᾽ 6ψ᾿ 
%%%% consonants at the beggining of words
.β6 
.γ6 
.δ6 
.ζ6 
.θ6 
.κ6 
.λ6 
.μ6 
.ν6 
.ξ6 
.π6 
.ρ6 
.σ6 .ϲ6 
.τ6 
.φ6 
.χ6 
.ψ6 
%%%% separable double consonants
4β1β 
4γ1γ 
4δ1δ 
4ζ1ζ 
4θ1θ 
4κ1κ 
4λ1λ 
4μ1μ 
4ν1ν 
4π1π 
4ρ1ρ 
4ῤ1ῥ 4ῤ1ῥ 
4σ1σ 4ϲ1ϲ 
4τ1τ 
4φ1φ 
4χ1χ 
4ψ1ψ 
%%%% other breakable consonant combinations
4β1ζ 
4β1θ 
4β1κ 
4β1μ 
4β1ν 
4β1ξ 
4β1π 
4β1σ 4β1ϲ 
4β1τ 
4β1φ 
4β1χ 
4β1ψ 
4γ1β 
4γ1ζ 
4γ1θ 
4γ1κ 
4γ1μ 
4ρ5γ2μ   % >'er-gma = >'ergo (>arq.) 
4γ1ξ 
4γ1π 
4γ1σ 4γ1ϲ 
4γ1τ 
4γ1φ 
4γ1χ 
4γ1ψ 
4δ1β 
4δ1γ 
4δ1ζ 
4δ1θ 
4δ1κ 
4δ1λ 
% "dm" --- not separable: dm~hsic = >exhm'erwsh (>arq.)
% "dn" --- not separable: dnofer'oc = zofer'oc, skotein'oc (>arq.)
%                        Dne'iperoc = potam'oc t~hc Rws'iac
4δ1ξ 
4δ1π 
4δ1σ 4δ1ϲ 
4δ1τ 
4δ1φ 
4δ1χ 
4δ1ψ 
4ζ1β   % "zb" and "zg" appear in the beggining of Greek words (e.g., in 
4ζ1γ   % Andriotes' Lexicon), but they're usually written as "sb" and "sg". 
4ζ1δ 
4ζ1θ 
4ζ1κ 
4ζ1λ 
4ζ1μ 
τζ2μ   % m'ana-tzment (m'ana-tzment) 
4ζ1ν 
4ζ1ξ 
4ζ1π 
4ζ1ρ 
4ζ1σ 4ζ1ϲ 
4ζ1τ 
4ζ1φ 
4ζ1χ 
4ζ1ψ 
4θ1β 
4θ1γ 
4θ1δ 
4θ1ζ 
4θ1κ 
4θ1μ 
4ρ5θ2μ   % por-jm'oc 
σθ2μ ϲθ2μ   % >i-sjm'oc 
4θ1ξ 
4θ1π 
4θ1σ 4θ1ϲ 
4θ1τ 
4θ1φ 
4θ1χ 
4θ1ψ 
4κ1β   % "kb" may not be separable: kb'anto kbantomhqanik`h 
4κ1γ 
4κ1δ 
4κ1ζ 
4κ1θ 
4λ5κ2μ   % >Al-km'hnh 
4ρ5κ2μ   % dar-km'a = draqm'h (>arq.) 
4κ1ξ 
4κ1π 
4κ1σ 4κ1ϲ 
4κ1φ 
4γ5κ2φ   % Frag-kfo'urth 
4ν5κ2φ   % Fran-kfo'urth 
4κ1χ 
4κ1ψ 
4λ1β 
4λ1γ 
4λ1δ 
4λ1ζ 
4λ1θ 
4λ1κ 
4λ1μ 
4λ1ν 
4λ1ξ 
4λ1π 
4λ1ρ 
4λ1σ 4λ1ϲ 
4λ1τ 
4λ1φ 
4λ1χ 
4λ1ψ 
4μ1β 
4μ1γ 
4μ1δ 
4μ1ζ 
4μ1θ 
4μ1κ 
4μ1λ 
4μ1ξ 
4μ1π 
4μ1ρ 
4μ1σ 4μ1ϲ 
4μ1τ 
4μ1φ 
4μ1χ 
4μ1ψ 
4ν1β 
4ν1γ 
4ν1δ 
4ν1ζ 
4ν1θ 
4ν1κ 
4ν1λ 
4ν1μ 
4ν1ξ 
4ν1π 
4ν1ρ 
4ν1σ 4ν1ϲ 
4ν1τ 
4ν1φ 
4ν1χ 
4ν1ψ 
4ξ1β 
4ξ1γ 
4ξ1δ 
4ξ1ζ 
4ξ1θ 
4ξ1κ 
4ξ1λ 
4ξ1μ 
4ξ1ν 
4ξ1π 
4ξ1ρ 
4ξ1σ 4ξ1ϲ 
4ξ1τ 
4γ5ξ2τ   % >el'eg-xte 
4ρ5ξ2τ   % <up'ar-xte 
4ξ1φ 
4ξ1χ 
4ξ1ψ 
4π1β 
4π1γ 
4π1δ 
4π1ζ 
4π1θ 
4π1κ 
4π1μ 
4π1ξ 
4π1σ 4π1ϲ 
4π1φ 
4π1χ 
4π1ψ 
4ρ1β 
4ρ1γ 
4ρ1δ 
4ρ1ζ 
4ρ1θ 
4ρ1κ 
4ρ1λ 
4ρ1μ 
4ρ1ν 
4ρ1ξ 
4ρ1π 
4ρ1σ 4ρ1ϲ 
4ρ1τ 
4ρ1φ 
4ρ1χ 
4ρ1ψ 
4σ1δ 4ϲ1δ   % "sd" may not be separable: sde'ugla = ze'ugla (>arq.) 
4σ1ζ 4ϲ1ζ 
4σ1ν 4ϲ1ν   % "sn" may not be separable: sn'iqi (= sb'erkoc) snompism'oc 
4σ1ξ 4ϲ1ξ 
4σ1ρ 4ϲ1ρ 
4σ1ψ 4ϲ1ψ 
4τ1β 
4τ1γ 
4τ1δ 
4τ1θ 
% "tl" --- not separable: tlhmws'unh = ft'wqia (>arq.)
4τ1ν 
4τ1ξ 
4τ1π 
4τ1φ 
στ2φ ϲτ2φ   % fa-stfountadiko Be-stfal'ia (German'ia) 
4τ1χ 
4τ1ψ 
4φ1β 
4φ1γ 
4φ1δ 
4φ1ζ 
4φ1κ   % "fk" may not be separable: fki'anw, fkias'idi 
4φ1ν 
4ρ5φ2ν   % >or-fn'oc = skotein'oc (>arq.) 
4φ1ξ 
4φ1π 
4φ1σ 4φ1ϲ 
4φ1χ 
4φ1ψ 
4χ1β 
4χ1γ 
4χ1δ 
4χ1ζ 
4χ1κ 
4χ1μ 
4ρ5χ2μ   % dar-qm'a = draqm'h (>arq.) 
4χ1ξ 
4χ1π 
4χ1σ 4χ1ϲ 
4χ1φ 
4χ1ψ 
4ψ1β 
4ψ1γ 
4ψ1δ 
4ψ1ζ 
4ψ1θ 
4ψ1κ 
4ψ1λ 
4ψ1μ 
4ψ1ν 
4ψ1ξ 
4ψ1π 
4ψ1ρ 
4ψ1σ 4ψ1ϲ 
4ψ1τ 
4μ5ψ2τ   % l'am-yte 
4ψ1φ 
4ψ1χ 
%%%%
%%%% non-separable nasal combinations (gk, mp, nt) and some exceptions
%%%%
βγ2κ 
4λ5γ2κ 
4ν5γ2κ 
4ρ5γ2κ 
σγ2κ ϲγ2κ 
4τ5γ2κ 
.γιου5γ2κο   % giou-gkosl'aboc 
5γ2κραντ.   % B'olgko-gkrant (Rws'ia) 
ἐμι5γ2κρ ἐμι5γ2κρ   % >emi-gkr'ec 
ἰ5γ2κου ἰ5γ2κου   % >i-gkou'ana 
ἴντρι5γ2κ ἴντρι5γ2κ   % >'intri-gka 
ἰντρι5γ2κ ἰντρι5γ2κ 
.καρα5γ2κι   % kara-gki'ozhc 
.μα5γ2κιό .μα5γ2κιό .μα5γ2κιό   % ma-gki'oroc 
.μπα5γ2κ   % mpa-gkat'ela mpa-gk'eta 
.μπι5γ2κ   % mpi-gk'onia 
.ντά5γ2κλ .ντά5γ2κλ .ντά5γ2κλ   % nt'a-gkla (??? not so sure) 
.ντα5γ2κλ   % nta-gklar'ac (??? not so sure) 
.ξε5γ2κ   % xe-gk'astri (??? not so sure) 
.ξέ5γ2κ .ξέ5γ2κ .ξέ5γ2κ 
.σαλτιπά5γ2κ .σαλτιπά5γ2κ .σαλτιπά5γ2κ .ϲαλτιπά5γ2κ .ϲαλτιπά5γ2κ .ϲαλτιπά5γ2κ   % saltip'a-gkoc (??? not so sure) 
.σι5γ2κ .ϲι5γ2κ   % si-gko'una 
.σπά5γ2κ .σπά5γ2κ .σπά5γ2κ .ϲπά5γ2κ .ϲπά5γ2κ .ϲπά5γ2κ   % sp'a-gkoc spa-gkoramm'enoc 
.σπα5γ2κ .ϲπα5γ2κ 
.φιό5γ2κ .φιό5γ2κ .φιό5γ2κ   % fi'o-gkoc fio-gk'aki 
.φιο5γ2κ 
.χούλι5γ2κ .χούλι5γ2κ .χούλι5γ2κ   % qo'uli-gkan qouligk'anoc qouli-gkanism'oc 
.χουλι5γ2κ 
%%%%
4ζ5μ2π 
4λ5μ2π 
4ν5μ2π 
4ρ5μ2π 
σμ2π ϲμ2π 
ἀλα5μ2που ἀλα5μ2που   % >ala-mpourn'ezika 
ἄ5μ2ακ ἄ5μ2ακ   % >'a-mpakoc 
ἀ5μ2πάκ ἀ5μ2πάκ ἀ5μ2πάκ 
ἀ5μ2παν ἀ5μ2παν   % >a-mpan'ozi >a-mpan-ton'arisma 
ἀ5μ2πάρ ἀ5μ2πάρ ἀ5μ2πάρ   % >a-mp'ara >a-mpar'wnw 
ἀ5μ2πᾶρ ἀ5μ2πᾶρ 
ἀ5μ2παρ ἀ5μ2παρ 
ἀ6μ3πάρι ἀ6μ3πάρι ἀ6μ3πάρι   % >am-p'ari 
ἀ6μ3παρι ἀ6μ3παρι 
ἀ5μ2πρ ἀ5μ2πρ   % >a-mpr'i 
ἀρα5μ2π ἀρα5μ2π   % >ara-mp'ac 
ἀρλού5μ2π ἀρλού5μ2π ἀρλού5μ2π   % >arlo'u-mpa 
ἀρλοῦ5μ2π ἀρλοῦ5μ2π 
ἀρλου5μ2π ἀρλου5μ2π 
.βό5μ2πιρ .βό5μ2πιρ .βό5μ2πιρ   % b'o-mpirac (??? not so sure) 
.βο5μ2πιρ   % bo-mpiriasm'enoc (??? not so sure) 
.γά5μ2πι .γά5μ2πι .γά5μ2πι   % g'a-mpia 
.γα5μ2πι 
.γιαρα5μ2π   % giara-mp'hc 
.ζεϊ5μ2π .ζεϊ5μ2π   % ze"i-mp'ekikoc 
ἰ5μ2πρα ἰ5μ2πρα   % >i-mpra'hm 
.καλα5μ2πα   % kala-mpal'iki 
.καλί5μ2πρ .καλί5μ2πρ .καλί5μ2πρ   % kal'i-mpra kali-mpr'arw 
.καλι5μ2πρ 
.κα5μ2πάδ .κα5μ2πάδ .κα5μ2πάδ   % ka-mp'adikoc (= qontr'oc) 
.κα5μ2παρέ .κα5μ2παρέ .κα5μ2παρέ   % ka-mpa-r'e ka-mparetzo'u 
.κα5μ2παρὲ .κα5μ2παρὲ 
.κα5μ2παρε 
.κα5μ2πίν .κα5μ2πίν .κα5μ2πίν   % ka-mp'ina ka-mpin'ec 
.κα5μ2πῖν .κα5μ2πῖν 
.κα5μ2πιν 
.κά5μ2ποτ .κά5μ2ποτ .κά5μ2ποτ   % k'a-mpoto (= >agglik'o <'ufasma) ka-mpot'inoc 
.κα5μ2πότ .κα5μ2πότ .κα5μ2πότ 
.κα5μ2ποτ 
.καου5μ2π   % kaou-mp'ohc 
.καρα5μ2π   % kara-mp'ina kara-mpini'eroc 
.καρα6μ3πόλ .καρα6μ3πόλ .καρα6μ3πόλ   % karam-p'ola 
.καρα6μ3πολ 
.καρνα5μ2π   % karna-mp'iti (= kounoup'idi) 
.κε5μ2π   % ke-mp'ap ke-mpaptz'hc ke-mp'ec (= tro~uloc) 
.κολι5μ2πρ   % koli-mpr'i 
.κολού5μ2πρ .κολού5μ2πρ .κολού5μ2πρ   % kolo'u-mpra (??? not so sure) 
.κολοῦ5μ2πρ .κολοῦ5μ2πρ 
.κολου5μ2πρ 
.κό5μ2πρ .κό5μ2πρ .κό5μ2πρ   % k'o-mpra 
.κο5μ2πρ 
.κο6μ3πρέσσ .κο6μ3πρέσσ .κο6μ3πρέσσ .κο6μ3πρέϲϲ .κο6μ3πρέϲϲ .κο6μ3πρέϲϲ   % kom-pr'essa 
.κο6μ3πρεσσ .κο6μ3πρεϲϲ 
.κοντρα5μ2π   % kontra-mp'aso kontra-mp'anto (= lajremp'orio) 
.κουλού5μ2πρ .κουλού5μ2πρ .κουλού5μ2πρ   % koulo'u-mpra (??? not so sure) 
.κουλοῦ5μ2πρ .κουλοῦ5μ2πρ 
.κουλου5μ2πρ 
.κου5μ2πού .κου5μ2πού .κου5μ2πού   % kou-mpo'uri kou-mpo'urac 
.κου5μ2ποῦ .κου5μ2ποῦ 
.κου5μ2που 
.κωλού5μ2πρ .κωλού5μ2πρ .κωλού5μ2πρ   % kwlo'u-mpra (??? not so sure) 
.κωλοῦ5μ2πρ .κωλοῦ5μ2πρ 
.κωλου5μ2πρ 
.λι5μ2πρ   % li-mpr'eto 
.λό5μ2π .λό5μ2π .λό5μ2π   % l'o-mpu (i) 
.μανιτό5μ2π .μανιτό5μ2π .μανιτό5μ2π   % manit'o-mpa (sit'ari) 
5μ2πα5μ2π   % mpa-mp'ac mpa-mp'a-kac mpa-mp'eshc qazo-mpa-mp'ac 
5μ2πά5μ2π 5μ2πά5μ2π 5μ2πά5μ2π   % mp'a-mpw mp'a-mpouska 
.μπα6μ3πάκι .μπα6μ3πάκι .μπα6μ3πάκι   % mpam-p'aki 
.μπα6μ3πακι 
.μπασκε2τ5μ2π .μπαϲκε2τ5μ2π   % mpasket-mpwl'istac 
.μπασι5μ2πουζ .μπαϲι5μ2πουζ   % mpasi-mpouzo~ukoc 
5μ2πέης. 5μ2πέης. 5μ2πέης. 5μ2πέηϲ. 5μ2πέηϲ. 5μ2πέηϲ.   % Petr'o-mpehc k.>'a.<'o. 
5μ2πεης. 5μ2πεηϲ. 
5μ2πέησ. 5μ2πέησ. 5μ2πέησ. 
5μ2πεησ. 
5μ2πέη. 5μ2πέη. 5μ2πέη. 
5μ2πεη. 
5μ2πέηδες. 5μ2πέηδες. 5μ2πέηδες. 5μ2πέηδεϲ. 5μ2πέηδεϲ. 5μ2πέηδεϲ. 
5μ2πέηδεσ. 5μ2πέηδεσ. 5μ2πέηδεσ. 
5μ2πέηδων. 5μ2πέηδων. 5μ2πέηδων. 
5μ2πέ5μ2π 5μ2πέ5μ2π 5μ2πέ5μ2π   % mp'e-mphc mp'e-mpa mpe-mp'ekoc bouturo-mpe-mp'ec 
5μ2πε5μ2π 
.μπι5μ2π   % mpi-mper'o mpi-mpel'o 
5μ2πογι   % nero-mpogi'a lado-mpogi'a 
.μπό5μ2πιρ .μπό5μ2πιρ .μπό5μ2πιρ   % mp'o-mpirac (??? not so sure) 
.μπο5μ2πιρ   % mpo-mpiriasm'enoc (??? not so sure) 
.μπο5μ2πότ .μπο5μ2πότ .μπο5μ2πότ   % mpo-mp'ota 
.μπο5μ2ποτ 
.μπου5μ2πούν .μπου5μ2πούν .μπου5μ2πούν   % mpou-mpoun'izw mpou-mpo'unac 
.μπου5μ2ποῦν .μπου5μ2ποῦν 
.μπου5μ2πουν 
.νό5μ2πελ .νό5μ2πελ .νό5μ2πελ   % n'o-mpel no-mpel'istac 
.νο5μ2πελ 
.ντό5μ2πρ .ντό5μ2πρ .ντό5μ2πρ   % nt'o-mproc nto-mpros'unh 
.ντο5μ2πρ 
.ξε5μ2π   % xe-mprosti'azw x'e-mparkoc 
.ξέ5μ2π .ξέ5μ2π .ξέ5μ2π 
ὄ5μ2πο ὄ5μ2πο   % >'o-mpoe >o-mpo"'istac 
ὀ5μ2πο ὀ5μ2πο 
.ρε5μ2π   % re-mp'ethc 
.ρέ5μ2π .ρέ5μ2π .ρέ5μ2π   % r'e-mpeloc 
.ρεπού5μ2πλ .ρεπού5μ2πλ .ρεπού5μ2πλ   % repo'u-mplika 
.ρεπου5μ2πλ   % repou-mplik'anoc 
.ρο5μ2π   % ro-mp'ot, ro-mpotik'h 
ρό5μ2πα ρό5μ2πα ρό5μ2πα   % r'o-mpa gkarntar'o-mpa pali'oro-mpa 
ρό5μ2πε ρό5μ2πε ρό5μ2πε 
ρό5μ2πω ρό5μ2πω ρό5μ2πω 
ρο5μ2πῶ ρο5μ2πῶ 
ρο5μ2πα 
ρο5μ2πε 
ρο5μ2πω 
.τρο6μ3π   % tro-mp'oni 
.τρό6μ3π .τρό6μ3π .τρό6μ3π   % tr'om-pa 
.ρου5μ2π   % rou-mp'ini 
.σα2μ5ποτ .ϲα2μ5ποτ   % sa-mpot'az sa-mpot'arw 
.σέ5μ2πρ .σέ5μ2πρ .σέ5μ2πρ .ϲέ5μ2πρ .ϲέ5μ2πρ .ϲέ5μ2πρ   % s'e-mproc 
.σκα5μ2παβ .ϲκα5μ2παβ   % ska-mpab'ia 
.σνο5μ2π .ϲνο5μ2π   % sno-mpar'ia sno-mpism'oc 
σό5μ2πα σό5μ2πα σό5μ2πα ϲό5μ2πα ϲό5μ2πα ϲό5μ2πα   % s'o-mpa xul'o-sompa 
